Florida, session 2026, SB190.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 14 15 Section 1.âSection 381.995, Florida Statutes, is created to 16 read: 17 381.995âPerimenopause and menopause workgroup and 18 information.â 19 (1)(a)âThe Department of Health shall establish a 20 perimenopause and menopause policy workgroup. The workgroup 21 shall: 22 1.âDevelop key messages relating to perimenopause and 23 menopause. 24 2.âSet initiative priorities. 25 3.âEnsure, in conjunction with diversity and health equity 26 stakeholders, that initiatives are representative of diverse 27 communities of women and that the messaging resonates, is 28 culturally appropriate, and is delivered by trusted messengers. 29 4.âCreate a coordinated communications strategy to focus on 30 multiple audiences and use a variety of communications tools to 31 reach: 32 a.âWomen and men of all ages. 33 b.âEmployers. 34 c.âMedical providers. 35 5.âConsider dissemination points for information, 36 including, but not limited to, personal trainers, yoga 37 instructors, hairdressers, religious meeting places, and 38 community centers. 39 6.âSupport efforts to communicate the science on the safety 40 of hormone replacement therapy (HRT) and nonhormonal therapies 41 in appropriate patients and their use in improving health for 42 menopausal women. 43 (b)âThe workgroup shall be composed of health care 44 providers, women who have experienced perimenopause or 45 menopause, advocates, and other interested parties and 46 associations. 47 (2)âThe Department of Health, in collaboration with the 48 workgroup, the Office of Womenâs Health, and relevant state 49 agencies, shall develop and make publicly available, by posting 50 on its website, resources and a website link to materials 51 relating to perimenopause and menopause. The resources must 52 include, but need not be limited to, all of the following: 53 (a)âAccurate scientific information on perimenopausal and 54 menopausal symptoms and treatment options. 55 (b)âInformation on health risks associated with reduced 56 estrogen production and what women can do to stay healthy. 57 (c)âA downloadable checklist that can be printed and taken 58 to a clinician visit and that details recommended preventive 59 care for women as they reach and move through midlife and 60 provides a set of questions women may want to ask their 61 clinician. 62 (d)âContent adapted from existing clinician-directed 63 materials relating to perimenopause and menopause, other federal 64 Offices of Womenâs Health, and tools created by patient 65 education and advocacy organizations. 66 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.